Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0019.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 39. (1) In every lease or license of residential
premises, the lessor or licensor covenants:
(a) That the premises and all common areas are fit for the use
intended by the parties.
(b) To keep the premises in reasonable repair during the term
of the lease or license, and to comply with the applicable health
and safety laws of the this state and of the local unit of
government where the premises are is located, except when the
OOI S00400'25 (S-1) 0eybz2


disrepair or violation of the applicable health or safety laws has
been caused by the tenants lessee's or licensee's wilful or
irresponsible conduct or lack of conduct.
(2) The parties to the lease or license may modify the
obligations imposed by this section where the lease or license has
a current term of at least 1 year.
(2) (3) The provisions of this section shall Subsection (1)
must be liberally construed, and the privilege of a prospective
lessee or licensee to inspect the premises before concluding a
lease or license shall must not defeat his the prospective lessee's
or licensee's right to have the benefit of the covenants
established herein.under subsection (1).
(3) Beginning on the effective date of the amendatory act that
added this subsection, a lessee or licensee shall notify a lessor
or licensor in writing of a defective condition on the premises.
Except as otherwise provided under subsection (6) and on receipt of
a written notice required under this subsection or otherwise having
actual notice of a defective condition, a lessor or licensor shall
commence repairs in accordance with all of the following:
(a) If the defective condition is hazardous to life or
imminently hazardous to the health and safety of the lessee or
licensee, the lessor or licensor shall commence repairs or removal
not more than 48 hours after receipt of the written notice.
(b) If the defective condition is the presence or reasonable
suspicion of the presence of visible mold growth as determined by
the tenant, excluding the presence of mold that is minor and found
on surfaces that can accumulate moisture as part of the functioning
and intended use of the rental unit, the lessor or licensor shall
commence repairs or removal not more than 72 hours after receipt of
OOI S00400'25 (S-1) 0eybz2


the written notice. The repairs or removal under this subdivision
must be in accordance with the ANSI/IICRC standard 520 for
professional mold remediation, or its successor publication.
(c) If the defective condition is the presence of bedbugs or
other pests or does not meet the requirements of subdivision (a) or
(b) but deprives the lessee or licensee of the use of appliances
supplied by the lessor or licensor, the lessor or licensor shall
commence repairs not later than 72 hours after the receipt of the
written notice.
(d) In all other cases, the lessor or licensor shall commence
repairs not more than 30 days after receipt of the written notice,
unless otherwise provided by the lease agreement.
(4) A lessor or licensor that does not commence repairs within
the time period described under subsection (3)(a) to (d) has
breached the rental agreement, warranty of habitability, and duty
to repair, and the lessee or licensee may do any of following:
(a) Withhold rent, deposit the rent into an escrow account,
and remit the rent to the lessor or licensor not later than 24
hours after the lessor or licensor completes the repairs.
(b) Commence repairs and deduct the costs of repairs from the
rent.
(5) A lessee or licensee that elects to proceed under
subsection (4)(b) shall do all of the following:
(a) Either of the following as applicable:
(i) For a defective condition described under subsection (3)(a)
to (c), obtain at least 3 free written repair estimates from an
individual licensed under the occupational code, 1980 PA 299, MCL
339.101 to 339.2677, or from a list of preferred individuals who
meet the requirements of this subparagraph provided by the lessor
OOI S00400'25 (S-1) 0eybz2


or licensor at the beginning of the lease.
(ii) For a defective condition described under subsection
(3)(d), obtain at least 3 free written repair estimates.
(b) Send the free written repair estimates to the lessor or
licensor with a written notice that states that the lessee or
licensee will make the repairs unless the lessor or licensor agrees
to make the repairs within 24 hours after the receipt of the
written repair estimates and the notice required under this
subdivision, and that the cost of making the repairs will be
deducted from the rent.
(c) Keep all receipts related to the repairs and note the
dates of repair.
(d) Send copies of all receipts and the remaining portion of
the rent to the lessor or licensor.
(6) The time period described under subsection (3) does not
apply if there is a natural disaster that makes it difficult for
the lessor or licensor to comply. If this subsection applies, the
time period for the lessor or licensor to commence repairs must be
determined on a case-by-case basis.
(7) A lessor or licensor shall not retaliate or discriminate
against a lessee or licensee that complies with subsections (4) and
(5). Retaliation or discrimination under this subsection includes,
but is not limited to, refusing to renew a lease solely because the
lessee or licensee exercised their rights under subsections (4) and
(5).
(8) A rental agreement entered into or renewed on or after the
effective date of the amendatory act that added subsection (3) must
incorporate the lessee's or licensee's right to repair and deduct
or withhold rent until repairs are completed as described under
OOI S00400'25 (S-1) 0eybz2


subsections (4) and (5).
(9) As used in this section:
(a) "Commence repairs" means physically initiating repairs.
(b) "Written notice" means a communication in writing that
includes text messages, email, or paper communication.
Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect
unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are
enacted into law:
(a) Senate Bill No. 20.
(b) Senate Bill No. 21.
Final Page
OOI S00400'25 (S-1) 0eybz2